Missouri, session 2026, SB921.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 105, 302, and 407, RSMo, are amended
by adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
105.2000, 302.029, and 407.2102, to read as follows:
105.2000. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Digital form of identification", any name or
number that may be used, alone or in conjunction with any
other information, to identify a specific individual,
including any of the following:
(a) Name, Social Security number, date of birth,
official state or government-issued driver's license or
identification number, alien registration number, government
passport number, or employer or taxpayer identification
number;
(b) Unique biometric data, such as fingerprint, voice
print, retina or iris image, or other unique physical
representation;
(c) Unique electronic identification number, address,
or routing code; or

SB 921 2
(d) Telecommunication identifying information or
access device;
(2) "Minor", any person under eighteen years of age;
(3) "Parent", a biological, foster, or adoptive
parent, a stepparent, or a legal guardian;
(4) "Personal data", any information relating to an
identifiable natural person;
(5) "Place of public accommodation", the same meaning
given to such term in section 213.010;
(6) "Public entity", the state of Missouri, any
department, division, board, commission, or other
instrumentality of the state, and any political subdivision
of the state, including any school district or public
institution of higher education.
2. A public entity shall not require any person to
obtain or maintain any digital form of identification.
3. A public entity may offer the use of a digital form
of identification when interacting with any person provided
the person is not required to obtain or use such digital
form of identification and a physical form of identification
is offered and can be used in lieu of the digital form of
identification.
4. (1) A person who has agreed to use a digital form
of identification shall be permitted, upon request, to view,
correct, remove, destroy, or restrict the usage of all
personal data associated with the person's own
identification.
(2) A person who has authorized the usage of any
personal data associated with the person's digital form of
identification for one purpose shall not be deemed
authorization for any other purpose unless written consent
is given by the person for each purpose.

SB 921 3
(3) Personal data of any person may only be collected
by a public entity for the purpose stated by the public
entity and only upon the consent of each individual person,
or in the case of a minor, only upon consent of a parent of
the minor.
(4) Personal data of any person shall not be sold or
transferred to any public or private entity without the
consent of the person.
5. (1) A public entity shall not, with respect to any
individual person, take any action or refuse to take any
action based solely on the personal data of a person.
(2) A digital form of identification shall not be
required by a public entity to enter any place of public
accommodation.
6. Any person may bring a cause of action in a court
of competent jurisdiction if the person alleges that a
public entity has violated this section. A public entity
found by a court to have violated this section shall be
liable to the person affected for not more than one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per occurrence.
7. This section shall not be construed to prohibit any
public entity from complying with any lawful request from a
law enforcement agency with respect to any person's personal
data.
302.029. 1. (1) No person shall be required to
obtain a mobile driver's license.
(2) A driver's license, including a mobile driver's
license, shall not be linked with any automated license
plate reader in this state without the written consent of
such person to whom the driver's license belongs.
2. For purposes of this section, the term "mobile
driver's license" means a data file that is:

SB 921 4
(1) Available on a mobile device that has connectivity
to the internet through an application that allows the
mobile device to download the data file from the department
of revenue;
(2) Contains all of the same data elements visible on
the face and back of the driver's license issued by the
department of revenue; and
(3) Displays the current status of the driver's
license.
407.2102. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Digital form of identification", any name or
number that may be used, alone or in conjunction with any
other information, to identify a specific individual,
including any of the following:
(a) Name, Social Security number, date of birth,
official state or government-issued driver's license or
identification number, alien registration number, government
passport number, or employer or taxpayer identification
number;
(b) Unique biometric data, such as fingerprint, voice
print, retina or iris image, or other unique physical
representation;
(c) Unique electronic identification number, address,
or routing code; or
(d) Telecommunication identifying information or
access device;
(2) "Personal data", any information relating to an
identifiable natural person;
(3) "Private entity", any for-profit or not-for-profit
organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint
venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership,

SB 921 5
limited liability company, or other entity or business
association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries,
majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates
of those entities or business associations.
2. (1) A private entity may offer the use of a
digital form of identification when interacting with any
person. A person who has agreed to use a digital form of
identification when interacting with a private entity shall
be permitted, upon request, to view, correct, remove,
destroy, or restrict the usage of all personal data
associated with the person's own digital form of
identification associated with the private entity.
(2) A person who has authorized the usage by a private
entity of any personal data associated with the person's
digital form of identification for one purpose shall not be
deemed authorization for any other purpose unless written
consent is given by the person for each purpose.
(3) Personal data of any person may only be collected
by a private entity for the purpose stated by the private
entity and only upon the consent of each individual person.
(4) Personal data of any person shall not be sold or
transferred to any public or private entity without the
consent of the person.
3. A private entity shall not, with respect to any
individual person, take any action or refuse to take any
action based solely on the personal data of a person.
4. Any person may bring a cause of action in a court
of competent jurisdiction if the person alleges that a
business entity has violated this section. A business
entity found by a court to have violated this section shall
be liable to the person affected for not more than one
hundred fifty thousand dollars per occurrence.

SB 921 6
5. This section shall not be construed to prohibit any
business entity from complying with any lawful request from
a law enforcement agency with respect to any person's
personal data.
✓